Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-28,108
Nebraska Drug Product Selection Act; act, how cited.

Sections 38-28,108 to 38-28,116 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Drug Product Selection Act.

Laws 1977, LB 103, § 8;

R.S.1943, (1996), § 71-5408;

Laws 2003, LB 667, § 13;

R.S.1943, (2009), § 71-5401.01;

Laws 2015, LB37, § 59.